Utah statutes.
13-2-5.   Powers of director.

The director has authority to:

(1)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, issue rules to administer and enforce the chapters listed in Section 13-2-1;

(2)  investigate the activities of any business governed by the laws administered and enforced by the division;

(3)  take administrative and judicial action against persons in violation of the division rules and the laws administered and enforced by it, including the issuance of cease and desist orders;

(4)  coordinate, cooperate, and assist with business and industry desiring or attempting to correct unfair business practices between competitors;

(5)  provide consumer information and education to the public and assist any organization providing such services; and

(6)  coordinate with, assist, and utilize the assistance of federal, state, and local agencies in the performance of the director's duties and the protection of the public.

